Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska60-2901
Act, how cited.

Sections 60-2901 to 60-2912 shall be known and may be cited as the Uniform Motor Vehicle Records Disclosure Act.

Laws 1997, LB 635, § 1;

Laws 2000, LB 1317, § 10.